Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1127.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(b) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.--* * *(b) As used in this act:* * *"Disposable menstrual product" means a product used by an 12345678910111213141516171819202122 individual in connection with the menstrual cycle, including, but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons, liners and other similar products.* * *" Fragrance allergen" means any of the following: (1) Amyl cinnamal.(2) Amylcinnamyl alcohol.(3) Anisyl alcohol.(4) Benzyl alcohol.(5) Benzyl benzoate.(6) Benzyl cinnamate.(7) Benzyl salicylate.(8) Cinnamyl alcohol.(9) Cinnamaldehyde.(10) Citral.(11) Citronellol.(12) Coumarin.(13) Eugenol.(14) Farnesol.(15) Geraniol.(16) Hexyl cinnamaladehyde.(17) Hydroxycitronellal.(18) Hydroxyisohexyl 3-cyclohexene carboxaldehyde, also known as Lyral.(19) Isoeugenol.(20) Lilial.(21) D-Limonene.(22) Linalool.(23) Methyl 2-octynoate.(24) G-Methylionone.20250SB1127PN1372 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (25) Oak moss extract.(26) Tree moss extract.(27) Any other fragrance allergen, as determined by the Consumer Advocate, included on an authoritative list or compendium of such compounds."Fragrance ingredient" means an intentionally added substance or complex mixture present in a menstrual product for which the sole purpose in the product is to impart an odor or scent or to mask odor.* * *" Ingredient" means an intentionally added substance present in a menstrual product.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 8.1. Disposable Menstrual Product Label Requirements.-- (a) The following shall apply to a label of a package or box containing menstrual products manufactured for sale or distribution in this Commonwealth:(1) The manufacturer shall print the label:(i) With a plain and conspicuous list of all ingredients, which shall be listed in order of predominance.(ii) In visible print with a minimum font size of ten points, and display the label on the side of the box.(2) The manufacturer shall change the label on a menstrual product because of a change of an ingredient or addition of a new ingredient.(3) Ingredients in the product shall be listed on the label by standardized nomenclature or common chemical name and shall be sufficiently clear to identify a component.(b) The requirements of this section shall apply to any 20250SB1127PN1372 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other labeling requirements established pursuant to this act.(c) Fragrance ingredients shall not be required to be listed on the labeling of a product except if a fragrance:(1) is a fragrance allergen; or(2) is not a fragrance allergen but is present in the product at a concentration at or above a level at which the Consumer Advocate determines that disclosure is necessary due to safety concern or risk to human health.(d) A manufacturer of a menstrual product shall post on a publicly accessible Internet website the ingredient information required to be printed on the label as described in subsection (a).(e) A person or entity that manufactures a menstrual product in violation of this section shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.Section 3. This act shall take effect in one year.20250SB1127PN1372 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516